Utah statutes.
76-6-520.   Criminal usury.

(1) A person is guilty of criminal usury when he knowingly engages in or directly or indirectly provides financing for the business of making loans at a higher rate of interest or consideration therefor than is authorized by law.

(2)  Criminal usury is a felony of the third degree.

